Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 336.431 is amended to read:
336.431. (1) The Department of Education  shall administer a Farm-to-School Grant Program as
provided by this section.
(2) A school district may apply to the department for a grant as follows:
(a) As a noncompetitive grant to assist  the school district with paying for costs incurred by the
school district to purchase food produced or processed in this state; or
(b) As a competitive grant to fund food-based,  agriculture-based and garden-based educational
activities in the school district.
(3)(a) Based on a noncompetitive process, the department shall provide  grants to school districts
to assist in paying for costs incurred by the school district to purchase food produced or  processed
in this state. The amount of a grant awarded as provided by this subsection shall be  determined by
the department based on the number of lunches served by the school district  during the previous
school year under the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program.
(b) A school  district that receives a grant under this subsection shall use the moneys for the
costs incurred by the school district to purchase food products that were:
(A) Purchased on or after the date the school district received notification from the  Department
of Education of the amount to be distributed to the school district as provided by this subsection;
(B) Produced or processed in this state; and
(C) Used for meals that are served as part of the United States Department  of Agriculture’s
child nutrition programs.
(c)(A) A school district may not  use any moneys received under this subsection to
supplant purchases of food produced  or processed in this state that the school district had
regularly purchased prior to the  date the school district first received a grant as provided
by this subsection.
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district may use  mon-
eys received under this subsection to supplant purchases  of food produced or processed in
this state that the school district had regularly purchased prior  to the date the school dis-
Enrolled House Bill 2038 (HB 2038-B) Page 1
trict first received a grant as provided  by this subsection if the food meets criteria estab-
lished by the State Board of Education by rule.
(4)(a) Based on a competitive process, the department shall provide  grants [ to school districts or
nonprofit organizations, or commodity commissions or councils organized under ORS  576.051 to
576.455 or ORS chapter 577 or 578, ] to assist in paying the costs incurred to  provide food-based,
agriculture-based or garden-based educational activities in the school district.  Grants  may be
provided to:
(A) School districts;
(B) Education service districts;
(C) Federally recognized Indian tribes;
(D) Schools overseen by the Bureau of Indian Education;
(E) Nonprofit organizations;
(F) Commodity commissions or councils organized under  ORS 576.051 to 576.455 or ORS
chapter 577 or 578; or
(G) Soil and water conservation districts organized  under ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and
568.900 to 568.933.
(b) An entity identified in paragraph (a) of  this subsection that receives a grant under this
subsection shall use the moneys  for costs directly associated with the educational activities, in-
cluding staff time, travel costs and equipment purchased for the activities.
(c) When awarding grants  under this subsection, preference shall be given to entities that pro-
pose educational activities that:
(A) Are well designed;
(B) Promote healthy food activities;
(C) Have clear educational objectives;
(D) Involve parents or the community;
(E) Are connected to a school district’s farm-to-school procurement activities; and
(F) Are culturally relevant to the students being served by the grant moneys.
(d) The department must ensure that the recipients of grants under this subsection:
(A) Represent a variety of school sizes and geographic locations; and
(B) Serve a high percentage of  children who qualify for free or reduced price school meals under
the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program.
(5) The Department of Education shall consult with the State Department of Agriculture to:
(a) Develop rules and standards related to the grants awarded under this section.
(b) Determine the recipients and amounts of grants awarded under this section.
(6) The Department of Education may expend for the administrative costs incurred under  this
section no more than two percent of all moneys received by the department for the grant program.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 336.431 by section 1 of this 2017 Act apply  to costs
incurred by a school district on or after July 1, 2017.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,500,000, which shall  be expended for the Farm-to-School
Grant Program under ORS 336.431.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 2038 (HB 2038-B) Page 2
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2038 (HB 2038-B) Page 3